Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB212.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "contribution" in section 3 of the act of December 19, 1990 (P.L.1200, No.202), known as the Solicitation of Funds for Charitable Purposes Act, is amended to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Contribution." The promise, grant or pledge of money, credit, property[,] or financial assistance [or other thing of 123456789101112131415161718192021 any kind or value, excluding volunteer services,] in response to a solicitation, including the payment or promise to pay in consideration of a performance, event or sale of a good or service. Payment by members of an organization for membership fees, dues, fines or assessments or for services rendered to individual members, if such fees, dues, fines or assessments confer a bona fide right, privilege, professional standing, honor or other direct benefit, shall not be deemed contributions, provided that membership is not conferred solely as consideration for making a contribution in response to a solicitation. Government grants or contracts shall not be deemed a contribution.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0212PN0159 - 2 - 1234567891011121314